Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2105SV (1) 91 ll/js S.F. 499 Section 1. Section 362.5, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The payment of lawful compensation of a city officer , 3 volunteer fire fighter as defined in section 85.61, emergency 4 medical care provider as defined in section 147A.1, or employee 5 holding more than one city office or position, the holding of 6 which is not incompatible with another public office or is 7 not prohibited by law. This section shall not be construed 8 to prohibit nominal stipends, compensation, incentives, or 9 benefits for volunteer fire fighters or emergency medical care 10 providers. 11 Sec. 2. Section 372.13, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 10. A council member, during the term for which that member 14 is elected, is not precluded from holding the office of chief 15 of the volunteer fire department or from serving the volunteer 16 fire department in any other position or capacity. A person 17 holding the office of chief of such a volunteer fire department 18 at the time of the personâs election to the city council may 19 continue to hold the office of chief of the fire department 20 during the city council term for which that person was elected. 21 A currently serving member may serve as chief of the volunteer 22 fire department upon a majority vote of the council. A council 23 member who is a candidate for the position of chief of the 24 volunteer fire department or an appointed officer position 25 shall abstain from voting upon the council memberâs own 26 appointment to the position. 27 Sec. 3. Section 384.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 384.3 General fund. 30 1. All moneys received for city government purposes from 31 taxes and other sources must be credited to the general fund 32 of the city, except that moneys received for the purposes of 33 the debt service fund, the trust and agency funds, the capital 34 improvements reserve fund, the emergency fund , and other 35 -1- LSB 2105SV (1) 91 ll/js 1/ 4 S.F. 499 funds established by state law must be deposited as otherwise 1 required or authorized by state law. All moneys received by 2 a city from the federal government must be reported to the 3 department of management , who shall transmit a copy to the 4 legislative services agency. 5 2. a. A city may establish an additional fund or a reserve 6 savings account to pay costs associated with the acquisition, 7 possession, and maintenance of major equipment for police, 8 fire, rescue, or emergency medical services. Moneys in a fund 9 or account established under this paragraph may remain in the 10 fund or account at the end of each fiscal year. 11 b. If a city has established an additional fund or a reserve 12 savings account under paragraph âaâ and has received a payment, 13 award, judgment, or insurance settlement for damaged police, 14 fire, rescue, or emergency medical services equipment or 15 vehicles, the city shall deposit the moneys into the relevant 16 fund or account rather than into the general fund of the city. 17 However, if a city uses moneys from its general fund to cover 18 costs to repair or replace damaged police, fire, rescue, or 19 emergency medical services equipment or vehicles, the city 20 may deposit into its general fund an amount received from the 21 payment, award, judgment, or insurance settlement that is equal 22 to the amount used from the general fund. The city shall 23 deposit any remaining amount received from the payment, award, 24 judgment, or insurance settlement into the relevant fund or 25 account established under paragraph âaâ . 26 c. If a city has established an additional fund under 27 paragraph âaâ , moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the 28 fiscal year may be deposited into a reserve savings account. 29 Moneys in a reserve savings account shall be used for the 30 purpose of maintaining or acquiring major equipment including 31 vehicles. 32